North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 2. Ballots and Voting Systems.
§ 163-165.8.
Voting systems: powers and duties of board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners, with the approval of the county board of elections, may adopt and acquire only a voting system of a type, make, and model certified by the State Board of Elections for use in some or all voting places in the county at
some or all elections.

The board of county commissioners may decline to adopt and acquire any voting system recommended by the county board of elections but may not adopt and acquire any voting system that has not been approved by the county board of elections. Article 8 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes does not apply to the purchase of a voting system certified by the State Board of Elections.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2005-323, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.9.
Voting systems: powers and duties of county board of elections.

Before approving the adoption and acquisition of any voting system by the board of county commissioners, the county board of elections shall do all of the following:

Recommend to the board of county commissioners which type of voting system should be acquired by the county.

Witness a demonstration, in that county or at a site designated by the State Board, of the type of voting system to be recommended and also witness a demonstration of at least one other type of voting system certified by the State Board.

Test the voting system in at least one of the following ways:

During an election, in at least one precinct in the county where the voting system would be used if adopted.

During a simulated election, in accordance with standards established by the State Board.

After the acquisition of any voting system, the county board of elections shall comply with any requirements of the State Board of Elections regarding training and support of the voting system by completing all of the following:

The county board of elections shall comply with all specifications of its voting system vendor for ballot printers. The county board of elections is authorized to contract with noncertified ballot printing vendors, so long as the noncertified ballot printing
vendor meets all specifications and all quality assurance requirements as set by the State Board of Elections.

The county board of elections shall annually maintain software license and maintenance agreements necessary to maintain the warranty of its voting system. A county board of elections may employ qualified personnel to maintain a voting system in lieu of
entering into maintenance agreements necessary to maintain the warranty of its voting system. State Board of Elections is not required to provide routine maintenance to any county board of elections that does not maintain
the warranty of its voting system. If the State Board of Elections provides any maintenance to a county that has not maintained the warranty of its voting system, the county shall reimburse the State for the cost. The State
Board of Elections shall report annually by January 15 to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations, to the Fiscal Research Division, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government, and to the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on implementation of this subdivision. If requested by the county board of elections, the State Board may enter into contracts on behalf of that county under this
subdivision, but such contracts must also be approved by the county board of elections. Any contract entered into under this subdivision shall be paid from non-State funds. Neither a county nor the State Board of Elections
shall enter into any contract with any vendor for software license and maintenance agreements unless the vendor agrees to (i) operate a training program for qualification of county personnel under this subsection with training
offered within the State of North Carolina and (ii) not dishonor warranties merely because the county is employing qualified personnel to maintain the voting system as long as the county:

Pays the costs of the annual software licensing agreement for that county.

Ensures that equipment (i) remains in full compliance with State certification requirements and (ii) remains in stock and supply available to the county for up to five years after the vendor discontinues distribution or sale of the equipment.

Maintains a tracking record to record and timely report all hardware issues and all repairs and provides those records for review by the vendor and by the State Board of Elections.

Provides that only parts provided by the vendor would be used to repair the vendor’s equipment, contingent on (i) the county being able to purchase necessary parts in a timely manner from the vendor and (ii) the vendor providing the equipment at least
at the lowest price at which it sells the equipment to any other customer in the United States.

Accepts financial responsibility for expenses related to voting equipment failure during an election if the failure is caused solely by work of the county technician.

The county board of elections shall not replace any voting system, or any portion thereof, without approval of the State Board of Elections.

The county board of elections may have its voting system repaired pursuant to its maintenance agreement but shall notify the State Board of Elections at the time of every repair, according to guidelines that shall be provided by the State Board of Elections.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2005-323, s. 4; 2007-391, s. 25; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 20; 2011-145, s. 26.3(a); 2012-142, s. 23.3(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 4(a); 2021-180, s. 37.6(b).

§ 163-165.9A.
Voting systems: requirements for voting systems vendors; penalties.

Duties of Vendor. — Every vendor that has a contract to provide a voting system in North Carolina shall do all of the following:

The vendor shall place in escrow with an independent escrow agent approved by the State Board of Elections all software that is relevant to functionality, setup, configuration, and operation of the voting system, including, but not limited to, a complete
copy of the source and executable code, build scripts, object libraries, application program interfaces, and complete documentation of all aspects of the system including, but not limited to, compiling instructions, design
documentation, technical documentation, user documentation, hardware and software specifications, drawings, records, and data. The State Board of Elections may require in its request for proposal that additional items be
escrowed, and if any vendor that agrees in a contract to escrow additional items, those items shall be subject to the provisions of this section. The documentation shall include a list of programmers responsible for creating
the software and a sworn affidavit that the source code includes all relevant program statements in low-level and high-level languages.

The vendor shall notify the State Board of Elections of any change in any item required to be escrowed by subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The chief executive officer of the vendor shall sign a sworn affidavit that the source code and other material in escrow is the same being used in its voting systems in this State. The chief executive officer shall ensure that the statement is true on
a continuing basis.

The vendor shall promptly notify the State Board of Elections and the county board of elections of any county using its voting system of any decertification of the same system in any state, of any defect in the same system known to have occurred anywhere,
and of any relevant defect known to have occurred in similar systems.

The vendor shall maintain an office in North Carolina with staff to service the contract.

Penalties. — Willful violation of any of the duties in subsection (a) of this section is a Class G felony. Substitution of source code into an operating voting system without notification as provided by subdivision (a)(2) of this section is a Class I
felony. In addition to any other applicable penalties, violations of this section are subject to a civil penalty to be assessed by the State Board of Elections in its discretion in an amount of up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) per violation. A civil penalty assessed under this section shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 163-278.34(e)

.

Definitions. — For the purposes of this section, the term “voting system” shall include an electronic poll book or a ballot duplication system.

History.
2005-323, s. 2(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.7(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.10.
Adequacy of voting system for each precinct.

The county board of elections shall make available for each precinct voting place an adequate quantity of official ballots or equipment. When the board of county commissioners has decided to adopt and purchase or lease a voting system for voting places
under the provisions of G.S. 165-165.8 [G.S. 163-165.8], the board of county commissioners shall, as soon as practical, provide for each of those voting places sufficient equipment of the approved voting system in complete working
order. If it is impractical to furnish each voting place with the equipment of the approved voting system, that which has been obtained may be placed in voting places chosen by the county board of elections. In that case, the county
board of elections shall choose the voting places and allocate the equipment in a way that as nearly as practicable provides equal access to the voting system for each voter. The county board of elections shall appoint as many voting
system custodians as may be necessary for the proper preparation of the system for each election and for its maintenance, storage, and care. The Executive Director of the State Board of Elections may permit a county board of elections
to provide more than one type of voting system in a precinct, but only upon a finding that doing so is necessary to comply with federal or State law.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2005-428, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).